Massachusetts, session 194th, H2657.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 22E the
following chapter:-
CHAPTER 22F. PURPLE ALERT PROGRAM TO ASSIST IN IDENTIFYING AND
LOCATING MISSING PERSONS WITH A DISABILITY
Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Executive Office”, the executive office of public safety and security.
“Local law enforcement agency”, a local police or sheriff's office that has jurisdiction
over the area where a person became missing.
of 4

“Missing person with a disability”, an individual whose whereabouts are unknown and
who has: (i) a mental or cognitive disability that is not Alzheimer's disease or a dementia-related
disorder; (ii) an intellectual disability or a developmental disability including Down syndrome;
(iii) a brain injury; (iv) another physical, mental, or emotional disability that is not related to
substance abuse; or (v) a combination of any of these.
Section 2. (a) The executive office shall establish a Purple Alert Program to assist in
identifying and locating missing persons with disabilities.
(b) The program shall include a system for rapidly disseminating information to the
public, including descriptions, photographs and information about the missing person's disability
and susceptibility to wandering behaviors.

(c) The Purple Alert system shall include procedures to monitor the use, activation and
results of alerts and a strategy for informing and educating law enforcement, the media and other
stakeholders concerning the alert.
Section 3. (a) After receiving missing person’s report pursuant to section 4, a local law
enforcement agency may activate a Purple Alert after determining that:
(i) a person is a missing person with a disability as defined in section 1;
(ii) there a credible threat that the missing person may be subject to immediate danger or
serious bodily harm because of the person’s disappearance;
(iii) the missing person most likely cannot be returned to safety without law enforcement
intervention; and
of 4

(iv) there is sufficient information available to disseminate to the public that could assist
in locating the missing person.
(b) A local law enforcement agency may activate a Purple Alert notwithstanding the
existence of an active Silver Alert or Amber Alert for the same missing person if the local law
enforcement agency determines that a Purple Alert may improve the chances of finding the
person.
Section 4. (a) To initiate a Purple Alert, the family, legal caregiver or custodian of the
missing person shall file a missing person's report with the local law enforcement agency where
the person became missing.
(b) Upon receiving a missing person’s report, the local law enforcement agency shall:
(i) determine if the case meets the qualifying criteria for a Purple Alert set forth in
subsection (a) of section 3;
(ii) notify the executive office and electronically send the completed Purple Alert forms
and available photographs or images of the missing person;
(iii) enter the information into the National Crime Information Center (NCIC);
(iv) initiate an alert to all local law enforcement, E911 and first responders to search the
immediate area;
(v)activate secondary alert systems to residents, businesses and broadcast media in the
immediate area;
of 4

(vi) provide a 24-hour phone number to receive calls while continuing the investigation;
and
(vii) update the family, legal caregiver or custodian of the missing person as new
information becomes available.
Section 5. (a) The Purple Alert Program shall provide, to the greatest extent possible, for
the protection of the privacy, dignity and independence of the missing person by including
standards aimed at preventing the inadvertent or unnecessary broadcasting or dissemination of
sensitive health and diagnostic information.
(b) The broadcasting and dissemination of alerts and related information shall be limited
to the geographic areas where the missing person could reasonably be, considering the person's
circumstances and physical and mental condition, the potential modes of transportation available
to the person or suspected to be involved, and the known or suspected circumstances of the
person’s disappearance.
Section 6. (a) A Purple Alert shall be terminated when the missing person is located or
when circumstances no longer warrant its continued activation.
(b) The local law enforcement agency that requested the activation of the Purple Alert
shall notify the executive office immediately upon locating the missing person or determining
that the alert should be terminated.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 90 days after passage.
of 4